Washington statutes.
RCW 18.89.080

Secretary and ad hoc committee immune from liability.

The secretary, ad hoc committee members, or individuals acting on their behalf are immune from suit in any civil action based on any licensure or disciplinary proceedings, or other official acts performed in the course of their duties.

[ 1997 c 334 s 7; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 513; 1991 c 3 s 231; 1987 c 415 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1997 c 334: See note following RCW 18.89.010.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.